apertium-tur-kir.kir.lexc
LEXICON V-INFL-NON-FINITE-REG

%<plist%>:%>м%{A%}й # ;                                       ! huh? "-mAj is used mainly for listing"

! Participles
%<prc_prp%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н%{I%} # ;  ! rare IS
%<prc_impf%>:%>%{E%} # ;   ! rare IS
%<prc_irre%>:%>%{E%}т # ;

! Verbal adverbs
%<gna_prp%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н%{I%} # ;  ! rare IS
%<gna_cnd%>:%>с%{A%} V-PERS-COND ;

! Gerunds
%<ger_past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н GER-INFL ; ! <coop> IS only ?
%<ger_perf%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н%>%{L%}%{I%}к GER-INFL ; !
%<ger_pres%>:%>%{I%}ш GER-INFL ;    ! <coop> IS only
%<ger%>:%>%{U%}%{U%} GER-INFL ;     ! <coop> IS only
%<ger_abs%>:%>%{U%}%{U%}%>ч%{I%}%>%{L%}%{I%}к GER-INFL ;     ! <coop> IS only
%<ger_notyet%>:%>{E%}% элек GER-INFL ;

! Verbal adjectives 
%<glp_past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-ADJ ;  ! <pl> IS okay
%<glp%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-ADJ ;  ! <pl> IS okay  ! both past (or perf?) and general
%<glp_hab%>:%>ч%{U%} V-ADJ ;  ! <pl> IS okay
!%<vadj_impf%>:%>%{E%}% турган V-ADJ ;       ! Done already by <prt_impf> тур<vaux><vadj_past>
%<glp_pot%>:%>%{U%}%{U%}%>ч%{U%} V-ADJ ;
%<glp_notyet%>:%>{E%}% элек V-ADJ ;

!  Imperatives

%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з # ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң # ;                      ! Dir/LR
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з%>%{L%}%{A%}р # ;

!  Optative/jussive forms

%<opt%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{A%}й%{I%}н # ;
%<opt%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}н # ;
%<opt%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}л%{A%} # ;
%<opt%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}н # ;
%<opt%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{E%}л%{I%} # ;
%<opt%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{A%}йл%{I%} # ; ! Dir/LR
%<opt%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{E%}л%{I%}к # ; ! Dir/LR  
%<opt%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{A%}йл%{I%}к # ; ! Dir/LR
%<opt%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}л%{A%} # ;
%<opt%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}л%{A%} # ;
%<opt%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}н # ;


LEXICON V-INFL-FINITE

! Finite forms
!%<pres%>:%>%{A%} V-PERS-PRES ;                                ! TODO: Check
%<aor%>:%>%{E%} V-PERS-PRES ;                                 !
%<fut%>:%>%{A%}р V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                                 !
%<fut%>:%>%{A%}%{A%}р V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                            ! Dir/LR
%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-PAST ;                            ! 
%<past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                           ! 
%<past%>%<evid%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н% экен V-PERS-COP-SUF ; ! evidential general past
%<ifi%>%<evid%>:%>%{I%}пт%{I%}р V-PERS-COP-SUF ;      ! evidential recent past
!%<cond%>:%>с%{A%} V-PERS-PAST ;                               ! not a finite form
!%<opt%>:%>м%{A%}к%>ч%{I%} V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                        !   
%<pih%>:%>ч%{U%} V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                                 ! 
%<pot%>:%>ч%{U%}%>д%{A%}й V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                        ! 
%<pcond%>:%>м%{A%}к V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                              ! 
%<notyet%>:%>{E%}% элек V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                          ! 

!%<neg%>%<pres%>:%>%{B%}%{A%} V-PERS-PRES ;                    ! TODO: Check  (WTF is this?)
!%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{A%}р V-PERS-COP ;              !
!%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{A%}%{A%}р V-PERS-COP ;         ! Dir/LR
!%<neg%>%<ifi%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-PAST ;         ! 
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%с V-PERS-COP-SUF ;              !
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{A%}с V-PERS-COP-SUF ;         ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<ifi%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н% жок V-PERS-COP-SUF ;         !
%<neg%>%<past%>%<evid%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н% жок% экен V-PERS-COP-SUF ; ! evidential general past
%<neg%>%<ifi%>%<evid%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{I%}пт%{I%}р V-PERS-COP-SUF ;      ! evidential recent past
%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{E%} V-PERS-PRES ;              !
!%<neg%>%<cond%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>с%{A%} V-PERS-PAST ;            ! not a finite form
%<neg%>%<past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н% эмес V-PERS-COP-SUF ;        ! 
%<neg%>%<pcond%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>м%{A%}к V-PERS-COP-SUF ;           ! 
%<neg%>%<pih%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>ч%{U%} V-PERS-COP-SUF ;              ! 

LEXICON V-INFL-ASIF

%<prt_perf%>:%>%{I%}п # ;
%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-PAST ;
%<ger_past%>%<sim%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н%>%{D%}%{A%}й PRED ; 
%<aor%>:%>%{E%} V-PERS-PRES ;

LEXICON V-INFL-TV-SHORT

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;
! FIXME: When we make it cyclical, this should really be V-INFL-TV
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-INFL-COMMON ;                              
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;                             
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р%>%{D%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;                             
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>%<pass%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р%>%{I%}%{l%} V-INFL-COMMON ;                             
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}%{l%}%>%{D%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;                             

! LEXICON V-INFL-IV-SHORT
! 
! %<v%>%<iv%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;
! ! FIXME: When we make it cyclical, this should really be V-INFL-IV
! %<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;                             
! %<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р%>%{D%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;                             
! %<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>%<pass%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р%>%{I%}%{l%} V-INFL-COMMON ;                             

LEXICON V-INFL-TV

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;
! FIXME: When we make it cyclical, this should really be V-INFL-TV
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-INFL-COMMON ;                              
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;                             
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р%>%{D%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;                             
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>%<pass%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р%>%{I%}%{l%} V-INFL-COMMON ;                             
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}%{l%}%>%{D%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;                             

LEXICON V-INFL-IV

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;
! FIXME: When we make it cyclical, this should really be V-INFL-TV
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;                             
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р%>%{D%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;                             
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>%<pass%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р%>%{I%}%{l%} V-INFL-COMMON ;                             

LEXICON V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS

%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%> V-INFL-COMMON ;                                    !
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;                                    !
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-INFL-COMMON ;                             !  FIXME: When we make it cyclical, this should really be V-INFL-TV

LEXICON VAUX-INFL

%<vaux%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON VAUX-ELE

%<vaux%>: V-PERS-COND ;

!LEXICON PRED
!
!%<pred%>%<subst%>: SUBST-COMMON ;
!%<pred%>: ATTR ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                  L E X I C O N    E N T R I E S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Copula

э%<cop%>%<ger%>:экен POSSESSION ;
э%<cop%>%<ger_perf%>:экен%>%{L%}%{I%}к POSSESSION ;

LEXICON Particles 

! FIXME: сыяктуу and экен have special grammar, but are ~modal particles
сыяктуу PART ; ! modal particle; adjective, usually with dative "similar to"
экен PART ; ! non-eyewitness modal particle
экен PART-PERS-COP ; ! non-eyewitness modal particle
!эле PART-PERS-PAST ; ! 

LEXICON Postadverbs 

гана POSTADV ; ! "only"
эле POSTADV ; ! "only"
деле POSTADV ; ! "even"
дагы POSTADV ; ! "... дагы" = "and ... too"
ашуун POSTADV ; ! "more than"
ашык POSTADV ; ! "more than"

LEXICON VerbStems
жат VAUX-INFL ; ! 
жат:ат VAUX-INFL ; ! Dir/LR
кал VAUX-INFL ; ! 
жүр VAUX-INFL ; ! 
ал VAUX-INFL ; ! 
отур VAUX-INFL ; ! 
тур VAUX-INFL ; ! 
сал VAUX-INFL ; ! 
кет VAUX-INFL ; ! 
чык VAUX-INFL ; !
бер VAUX-INFL ; !
бол VAUX-INFL ; !
бүт VAUX-INFL ; !
башта VAUX-INFL ; !
жазда VAUX-INFL ; !
кел VAUX-INFL ; !
эле VAUX-ELE ; !  
эле%<qst%>:беле VAUX-ELE ; ! CHECK: is this the right way to do this?
айлан V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "turn around"
айлан:айландыр V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! 
ач V-INFL-TV ; ! "open"
аш V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "pass/exceed"
аш:ашыр V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "make exceed"
бас V-INFL-IV ; ! "walk"
бүт V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "to finish"
бүт:бүтүр V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "to finish"
жат V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "lie"
жат:жаткыз V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "lie down"
де V-INFL-TV-SHORT ; ! "say"
же V-INFL-TV-SHORT ; ! "eat"
жуу V-INFL-TV-SHORT ; ! "wash"
куу V-INFL-TV-SHORT ; ! "chase"
зыян% кел V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "for harm to come"
зыян% кел:зыян% келтир V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "to cause harm"
кел V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "come"
кел:келтир V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "make come"
кет V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "go away / leave"
кет:кетир V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "to make leave"
маектеш V-INFL-TV ;
окшо V-INFL-IV ; ! "be similar to"
тий:тийгиз V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "make touch"
тур V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "stand, live"
тур:тургуз V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "stand up (trans)"
ук V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "listen"
ук V-INFL-TV ; ! "listen / hear"
ук:угуз V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "make listen"
өл V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "die"
өл:өлтүр V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "kill"
өт V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "pass"
өт:өткөр V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "pass"
өт:өткөз V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "pass"  ! Dir/LR
ак V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "flow"
ак:агыз V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "make flow"
отур V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "sit"
олтур V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "sit"              ! Dir/LR
отур:отургуз V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "sit"
олтур:олтургуз V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "sit"  ! Dir/LR
арна V-INFL-IV ; 
быш V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "cook" / "be cooked"
быш:бышыр V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "cook"
бүктө V-INFL-TV ; 
кий V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "get dressed"
кий:кийгиз V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "dress"
жаша V-INFL-IV ; 
жытта V-INFL-TV ; 
кал V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "stay, remain"
кал:калтыр V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "leave (behind)"
кир V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "enter"
кир:киргиз V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "put in, enter (e.g. data)"
чыда V-INFL-IV ; ! "be patient"
кучакта V-INFL-TV ; 
көч V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "move"
көч:көчүр V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "make move"
мыйооло V-INFL-IV ; ! "meow"
пайда% кыл V-INFL-TV ; 
сез V-INFL-IV ; ! "feel"
тартын V-INFL-TV ; 
терде V-INFL-IV ; ! "sweat"
төмөнсүн V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "to feel down" 
төмөнсүн:төмөнсүнт V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "to make _ feel down"
түш V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "fall"
түш:түшүр V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "to make fall"
шаш V-INFL-IV ; ! "hurry"
ушала V-INFL-TV ; 
чык V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "to exit/leave"
чык:чыгар V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "to take/put/move [object] out"
үйлө V-INFL-TV ; 
үр V-INFL-IV ; 
өч V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "turn off"
өч:өчүр V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "make turn off"
кат V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "to get hard"
кат:катыр V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "to make hard"
улан V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; 
улан:улант V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! Dir/LR
улан:уландыр V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; 
каала V-INFL-TV ; ! "want"
кабылда V-INFL-TV ;
жет V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; 
жет:жеткир V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ;
жет:жеткиз V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! Dir/LR
иште V-INFL-IV ;  ! "work"
чогул V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ;
чогул:чогулт V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ;
чогул:чогулдур V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! Dir/LR
корго V-INFL-TV ;
жеңил V-INFL-TV ;
тос V-INFL-TV ;
узар V-INFL-IV ;
камты V-INFL-TV ;
тапшыр V-INFL-TV ;
куткар V-INFL-TV ;
бомбала V-INFL-TV ;
баш% тарт V-INFL-IV ;
тая V-INFL-TV ;
силкилде V-INFL-IV ;
чекте V-INFL-TV ;
мин V-INFL-TV ; ! "ride"
оозун% бекит V-INFL-TV ;
маалыматтан V-INFL-IV ;
тартыш V-INFL-TV ;
артка% жыл V-INFL-IV ;
катуулаш V-INFL-IV ;
үшү V-INFL-IV ; ! "to be cold"
тордо V-INFL-TV ;
тынык V-INFL-IV ;
бириктир V-INFL-TV ;
салам% бер V-INFL-IV ;
топторго% бөл V-INFL-TV ;
эңсе V-INFL-IV ; ! "to desire"  CHECK transitivity
сөк V-INFL-TV ;
тирил V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ;  ! "come to live"
жолдо V-INFL-IV ;
баамда V-INFL-IV ;
кулпу% сал V-INFL-TV ;
сууса V-INFL-IV ;
мүдүрүл V-INFL-IV ;
үндө V-INFL-IV ;
силки V-INFL-TV ;
зарылдык% туй V-INFL-IV ;
ары-бери% учуп% тур V-INFL-IV ;
почта% менен% жибер V-INFL-TV ;
көңүл% ач V-INFL-IV ;
жама V-INFL-TV ;
табын V-INFL-IV ;
жасак% кой V-INFL-TV ;
өзөктөн V-INFL-IV ;
ий V-INFL-TV ;
кыялдан V-INFL-IV ;
оона V-INFL-IV ;
